Maryland, session 2026, SB0652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 1F OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE; OR
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 1F. ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING.
9–1F–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL
COMMISSION.
(C) “DIVISION” MEANS THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(D) “FINANCIAL TRANSACTION PROVIDER” MEANS ANY PERSON THAT
FACILITATES OR PARTICIPATES IN ANY FINANCIAL TRANSACTION BETWEEN AN
ONLINE GAMBLING PLAYER AND AN ONLINE GAMBLING OPERATOR, INCLUDING A
PAYMENT PROCESSOR, CREDIT CARD ISSUER, FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, MONEY
TRANSMITTING BUSINESS, OR PAYMENT NETWORK UTILIZED TO EFFECT A CREDIT
CARD TRANSACTION, A DEBIT CARD TRANSACTION, AN ELECTRONIC FUND

SENATE BILL 652 3
TRANSFER OR A MONEY TRANSMITTING SERVICE, OR ANY OTHER PARTICIPANT IN A
DESIGNATED PAYMENT SYSTEM.
(E) “ILLEGAL” MEANS NOT EXPRESSLY AUTHORIZED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
(F) “ONLINE GAMBLING” MEANS THE BUSINESS OF OFFERING OR
ACCEPTING WAGERS, THROUGH AN ONLINE GAMING SYSTEM ON A COMPUTER,
MOBILE DEVICE, TABLET, OR ANY OTHER INTERACTIVE DEVICE, ON ANY GAME,
CONTEST, LOTTERY, PROMOTION, OR CONTRIVANCE THEREOF, INCLUDING TABLE
GAMES, SLOT MACHINES, VIDEO POKER, SWEEPSTAKES GAMES, GAMES OF CHANCE,
AND ANY OTHER GAME TYPICALLY OFFERED IN A CASINO.
(G) (1) “ONLINE GAMBLING OPERATOR” MEANS A PERSON WHO OWNS,
MAINTAINS, OR OPERATES AN INTERNET WEBSITE THAT IS USED FOR ILLEGAL
ONLINE GAMBLING.
(2) “ONLINE GAMBLING OPERATOR” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON
LICENSED TO CONDUCT ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING OR FANTASY COMPETITIONS
UNDER SUBTITLES 1D AND 1E OF THIS TITLE.
(H) “PLATFORM PROVIDER” MEANS ANY PERSON THAT:
(1) STORES OR HOSTS CONTENT, FILES, DATA, AND OTHER
INFORMATION ON A WEB SERVER; AND
(2) MAKES THE CONTENT, FILES, DATA, OR OTHER INFORMATION
ACCESSIBLE ON AN INTERNET WEBSITE VIA A COMPUTER, MOBILE DEVICE, TABLET,
OR OTHER INTERACTIVE DEVICE.
(I) “SWEEPSTAKES GAMES” MEANS A GAME, CONTEST, OR PROMOTION
THAT:
(1) UTILIZES A DUAL–CURRENCY SYSTEM OF PAYMENT ALLOWING
THE PLAYER TO EXCHANGE THE CURRENCY FOR ANY PRIZE, AWARD, CASH OR CASH
EQUIVALENTS, OR CHANCE TO WIN ANY PRIZE, AWARD, CASH OR CASH
EQUIVALENTS; AND
(2) SIMULATES ANY FORM OF GAMBLING, INCLUDING:
(I) CASINO–STYLE GAMES, INCLUDING SLOT MACHINES, VIDEO
POKER, AND TABLE GAMES SUCH AS BLACKJACK, ROULETTE, CRAPS, AND POKER;

SENATE BILL 652
(II) LOTTERY GAMES INCLUDING DRAW GAMES, INSTANT WIN
GAMES, KENO, AND BINGO; AND
(III) SPORTS WAGERING.
(J) “WAGER” MEANS THE PROVISION OF CONSIDERATION, INCLUDING
MONEY OR ANYTHING OF VALUE, IN EXCHANGE FOR THE OPPORTUNITY TO PLAY ANY
GAME, CONTEST, LOTTERY, OR CONTRIVANCE AND RECEIVE MONEY OR SOMETHING
OF VALUE IN THE EVENT OF A CERTAIN OUTCOME, WHICH OUTCOME IS DETERMINED
BY SKILL, CHANCE, OR ELEMENTS OF SKILL AND CHANCE.
9–1F–02.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON LICENSED TO OFFER ONLINE
SPORTS WAGERING OR FANTASY COMPETITIONS UNDER SUBTITLES 1D AND 1E OF
THIS TITLE.
9–1F–03.
A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) OPERATE, OFFER, CONDUCT, ENGAGE IN, OR PROMOTE ILLEGAL
ONLINE GAMBLING IN THE STATE; OR
(2) KNOWINGLY SUPPORT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, THE
OPERATION, CONDUCT, OR PROMOTION OF ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING IN THE
STATE.
9–1F–04.
(A) (1) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, ACTING THROUGH
THE DIVISION, OR A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY MAY ISSUE A WRITTEN CEASE AND
DESIST ORDER TO ANY PERSON THAT VIOLATES § 9–1F–03(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) SPECIFY THE ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING ACTIVITY;
(II) STATE THAT THE PERSON HAS 10 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON
WHICH THE ORDER IS RECEIVED TO BLOCK THE ABILITY OF INDIVIDUALS
PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN THE STATE TO ACCESS THE ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING
ACTIVITY; AND

SENATE BILL 652 5
(III) STATE THAT FAILURE TO BLOCK ACCESS TO THE ILLEGAL
ONLINE GAMBLING ACTIVITY WITHIN 10 DAYS MAY RESULT IN IMPRISONMENT OR A
FINE OR BOTH, AS PROVIDED UNDER § 9–1F–06(A)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY WHO IS NOT THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL WHO ISSUES A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL FORWARD A COPY OF THE ORDER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL MAINTAIN:
(I) A DEPOSITORY TO COLLECT, MAINTAIN, AND RETAIN EACH
CEASE AND DESIST ORDER ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) A LIST, PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL’S INTERNET WEBSITE, THAT IDENTIFIES THE NAME OF EACH
ONLINE GAMBLING OPERATOR AND THE ASSOCIATED ONLINE GAMBLING INTERNET
WEBSITE URL ADDRESS THAT HAS BEEN ISSUED A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER.
(3) THE FAILURE OF A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY OR THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL TO COMPLY WITH THIS SUBSECTION IS NOT A DEFENSE TO ANY ACTION
COMMENCED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE SERVED:
(I) IN COMPLIANCE WITH MARYLAND RULES 2–121 AND 2–124;
OR
(II) BY PUBLICATION IN COMPLIANCE WITH MARYLAND RULE
2–122(A)(2).
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS NOT REQUIRED TO MAKE
REASONABLE EFFORTS TO LOCATE THE ONLINE GAMBLING OPERATOR BEFORE
SERVING THE CEASE AND DESIST ORDER BY PUBLICATION.
(D) A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER SERVED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION:
(1) IS ADMISSIBLE IN ANY PROCEEDING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) CONSTITUTES PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON HAS
KNOWLEDGE THAT ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING WAS OCCURRING ON THE ONLINE
GAMBLING OPERATOR’S INTERNET WEBSITE.

SENATE BILL 652
(E) A PERSON OUTSIDE THE STATE WHO OWNS, MAINTAINS, OR OPERATES
AN INTERNET WEBSITE THAT TRANSMITS INFORMATION THROUGH OR WITH A
PLATFORM PROVIDER AND WHO KNOWS OR SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE
INFORMATION IS BROADCAST WITHIN THE STATE SUBMITS TO THE JURISDICTION
OF STATE COURTS FOR ENFORCEMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) BEFORE ISSUING A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PROVIDE REASONABLE NOTICE TO
THE COMMISSION TO ALLOW THE COMMISSION TO DETERMINE WHETHER IT WILL
JOIN THE ORDER.
9–1F–05.
WHENEVER THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, ACTING THROUGH THE DIVISION, OR
A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT A PERSON IS VIOLATING
§ 9–1F–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR TAKING ANY OTHER ACTION IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY MAY BRING AN
ACTION IN THE NAME OF THE STATE TO RESTRAIN BY TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT
INJUNCTION THE CONDUCT GIVING RISE TO THE VIOLATION.
9–1F–06.
(A) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES § 9–1F–03(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 3
YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $50,000 OR BOTH; AND
(II) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $100,000 OR BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES § 9–1F–03(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS
SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $25,000;
AND
(II) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $50,000.
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION:

SENATE BILL 652 7
(1) EACH ONLINE GAMBLING WAGER OFFERED OR ACCEPTED BY A
PERSON CONSTITUTES A SEPARATE VIOLATION; AND
(2) EACH INDIVIDUAL PROMOTION OF ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING IN
THE STATE CONSTITUTES A SEPARATE VIOLATION.
(C) A COURT SHALL ORDER THE FORFEITURE OF ANY PROFITS, GAINS,
GROSS RECEIPTS, OR OTHER BENEFITS EARNED BY A PERSON IN CONNECTION WITH
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL REVOKE A GAMING LICENSE ISSUED UNDER
THIS TITLE HELD BY A PERSON FOUND TO HAVE VIOLATED § 9–1F–03 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, AND THE PERSON IS INELIGIBLE IN THE FUTURE TO HOLD A GAMING
LICENSE ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION.
9–1F–07.
(A) A FINANCIAL TRANSACTION PROVIDER MAY NOT KNOWINGLY ACCEPT
OR PROCESS ANY FINANCIAL TRANSACTION IN CONNECTION WITH THE
PARTICIPATION OF A PERSON IN ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING.
(B) A FINANCIAL TRANSACTION PROVIDER SHALL BE DEEMED TO HAVE
CONSTRUCTIVE KNOWLEDGE THAT ALL PERSONS AND INTERNET WEBSITE URLS
IDENTIFIED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1F–04 OF THIS
SUBTITLE ARE ENGAGED IN ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING.
9–1F–08.
(A) (1) A PLATFORM PROVIDER MAY NOT RECEIVE OR TRANSMIT
THROUGH ITS SERVICE ANY EXCHANGE OF INFORMATION THAT IT REASONABLY
BELIEVES IS OR WILL BE SENT IN CONNECTION WITH THE PARTICIPATION OF A
PERSON IN ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING.
(2) A PLATFORM PROVIDER IS DEEMED TO HAVE CONSTRUCTIVE
KNOWLEDGE THAT ALL PERSONS AND WEBSITE URLS IDENTIFIED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1F–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE ARE
ENGAGED IN ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING.
(B) BEFORE HOSTING, FACILITATING, OR TRANSMITTING ANY ONLINE
GAMBLING ADVERTISEMENT ON A WEBSITE, A PLATFORM PROVIDER SHALL:
(1) OBTAIN A CERTIFIED COPY OF THE ONLINE GAMBLING
OPERATOR’S LICENSE OR PERMIT TO OFFER ONLINE GAMBLING IN THE STATE; OR

SENATE BILL 652
(2) OBTAIN WRITTEN CONFIRMATION FROM THE COMMISSION THAT
THE OPERATOR IS LICENSED OR PERMITTED TO OFFER ONLINE GAMBLING IN THE
STATE.
9–1F–09.
(A) (1) A PLATFORM PROVIDER MAY, ON ITS OWN INITIATIVE, BLOCK THE
RECEIPT OR TRANSMISSION THROUGH ITS SERVICE ANY EXCHANGE OF
INFORMATION THAT IT REASONABLY BELIEVES IS OR WILL BE SENT IN VIOLATION
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A PLATFORM PROVIDER MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE IN TORT TO
ANY PERSON FOR BLOCKING THE RECEIPT OR TRANSMISSION OF INFORMATION
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) (I) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, ACTING
THROUGH THE DIVISION, OR A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY MAY ISSUE A WRITTEN
CEASE AND DESIST ORDER TO A PLATFORM PROVIDER DIRECTING THAT IT BLOCK
THE RECEIPT OR TRANSMISSION THROUGH ITS SERVICE OF ANY EXCHANGE OF
INFORMATION IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE AND TAKE DOWN OR DISABLE ANY
INTERNET WEBSITE CONDUCTING OR OFFERING ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING TO
PERSONS PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(II) THE CEASE AND DESIST ORDER SHALL:
1. IDENTIFY THE ONLINE GAMBLING INTERNET
WEBSITE URL THAT THE PLATFORM PROVIDER MUST DISABLE AND FOR WHICH IT
MUST BLOCK THE RECEIPT OR TRANSMISSION OF ANY EXCHANGE OF INFORMATION
THROUGH ITS SERVICE;
2. STATE THAT THE PLATFORM PROVIDER HAS 30 DAYS
AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE ORDER IS RECEIVED TO DISABLE THE ONLINE
GAMBLING WEBSITE FROM ACCESS BY INDIVIDUALS PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN THE
STATE AND BLOCK THE RECEIPT OR TRANSMISSION OF INFORMATION THROUGH ITS
SERVICE AS REQUIRED IN THE ORDER; AND
3. STATE THAT FAILURE TO DISABLE THE ONLINE
GAMBLING INTERNET WEBSITE FROM ACCESS BY PERSONS PHYSICALLY LOCATED
IN THE STATE AND BLOCK THE RECEIPT OR TRANSMISSION OF INFORMATION
THROUGH ITS SERVICE WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE ORDER MAY RESULT
IN A FINE UNDER § 9–1F–06(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR EACH DAY THAT THE
ONLINE GAMBLING INTERNET WEBSITE URL IS NOT DISABLED TO PERSONS

SENATE BILL 652 9
PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN THE STATE AND FOR EACH RECEIPT OR TRANSMISSION OF
INFORMATION THROUGH ITS SERVICE AS REQUIRED IN THE ORDER.
(III) A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH MAY BE SERVED ON A PLATFORM PROVIDER BY REGISTERED MAIL OR
FIRST–CLASS MAIL AT ANY ADDRESS REGISTERED WITH THE STATE FOR THE
PLATFORM PROVIDER OR AT WHICH THE PLATFORM PROVIDER CONDUCTS
BUSINESS.
(IV) A PLATFORM PROVIDER SHALL TIMELY COMPLY WITH A
CEASE AND DESIST ORDER SERVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PARAGRAPH.
(V) A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER SERVED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH:
1. IS ADMISSIBLE IN ANY PROCEEDING UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
2. CONSTITUTES PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE THAT A
PLATFORM PROVIDER HAD KNOWLEDGE THAT ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING WAS
OCCURRING ON THE ONLINE GAMBLING INTERNET WEBSITE URL IDENTIFIED IN
THE ORDER.
(VI) A PLATFORM PROVIDER WHOSE PRINCIPAL PLACE OF
BUSINESS IS OUTSIDE THE STATE WHOSE SERVICE FACILITATES THE EXCHANGE OF
INFORMATION OVER THE INTERNET TO OR FROM PERSONS PHYSICALLY LOCATED
IN THE STATE SUBMITS TO THE JURISDICTION OF STATE COURTS FOR
ENFORCEMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) A FINANCIAL TRANSACTION PROVIDER MAY, ON ITS OWN
INITIATIVE, BLOCK, PROHIBIT, PREVENT, OR OTHERWISE REFUSE TO HONOR ANY
FINANCIAL TRANSACTION THAT IT REASONABLY BELIEVES IS OR WILL BE IN
VIOLATION OF § 9–1F–07 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A FINANCIAL TRANSACTION PROVIDER MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE
IN TORT TO ANY PERSON FOR TAKING THE ACTIONS AUTHORIZED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, ACTING THROUGH
THE DIVISION, OR A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY MAY ISSUE A WRITTEN CEASE AND
DESIST ORDER TO ANY APPLICANT, LICENSED ENTITY, FINANCIAL TRANSACTION
PROVIDER, GEOLOCATION PROVIDER, GAMING CONTENT SUPPLIER, PROMOTER,
CELEBRITY ENDORSER, MEDIA AFFILIATE, OR ANY OTHER PERSON TO DISCONTINUE

SENATE BILL 652
ITS SUPPORT OF THE OPERATION, CONDUCT, OR PROMOTION OF ILLEGAL ONLINE
GAMBLING WITHIN THE STATE.
(2) THE CEASE AND DESIST ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL:
(I) IDENTIFY THE ONLINE GAMBLING INTERNET WEBSITE URL
THAT THE PERSON MUST CEASE, BLOCK, DISCONTINUE, AND PREVENT ANY SUPPORT
OF WITH RESPECT TO ACTIVITIES INVOLVING ONLINE GAMBLING WITHIN THE
STATE;
(II) STATE THAT THE PERSON HAS 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON
WHICH THE ORDER IS RECEIVED TO IMPLEMENT THE DIRECTIVES IN THE ORDER;
AND
(III) STATE THAT FAILURE TO IMPLEMENT THE DIRECTIVES SET
FORTH IN THE ORDER WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE ORDER MAY RESULT
IN A FINE UNDER § 9–1F–06(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR EACH ACT OF SUPPORT IN
RELATION TO THE ONLINE GAMBLING INTERNET WEBSITE URL IDENTIFIED IN THE
ORDER INVOLVING A PERSON PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(3) A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
MAY BE SERVED ON THE PERSON BY REGISTERED MAIL OR FIRST–CLASS MAIL AT
ANY ADDRESS REGISTERED WITH THE STATE FOR THE PERSON OR AT WHICH THE
PERSON CONDUCTS BUSINESS.
(4) A PERSON SHALL COMPLY TIMELY WITH A CEASE AND DESIST
ORDER SERVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(5) A CEASE AND DESIST ORDER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) IS ADMISSIBLE IN ANY PROCEEDING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(II) CONSTITUTES PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON
HAS KNOWLEDGE THAT ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING WAS OCCURRING ON THE
ONLINE GAMBLING INTERNET WEBSITE URL IDENTIFIED IN THE ORDER.
(6) A PERSON WHOSE PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS IS OUTSIDE
THE STATE THAT SUPPORTS ONLINE GAMBLING WITHIN OR INVOLVING ANY PERSON
PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN THE STATE SUBMITS TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE STATE
COURTS FOR ENFORCEMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 652 11
(D) THE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION MAY CONSULT WITH THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL ON THE ISSUANCE OF CEASE AND DESIST ORDERS UNDER SUBSECTIONS
(A)(3) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION.
9–1F–10.
(A) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDY UNDER CURRENT LAW, ON
APPLICATION BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY AND
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER PROCEEDINGS HAVE BEEN INITIATED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, A COURT MAY ISSUE ANY RELIEF THAT IT DEEMS APPROPRIATE TO
PREVENT AND RESTRAIN ACTIVITIES PROHIBITED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE RELIEF MAY INCLUDE A TEMPORARY RESTRAINING ORDER, A
PRELIMINARY INJUNCTION, OR AN INJUNCTION AGAINST ANY PERSON TO PREVENT
OR RESTRAIN ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING AND ANY RELATED TRANSACTIONS OR
ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING THE REMOVAL OF ANY ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING
INTERNET WEBSITE, THE FREEZING OF BANK OR CREDIT ACCOUNTS ASSOCIATED
WITH THE INTERNET WEBSITE OR THE ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING ACTIVITY, AND
THE REMOVAL OF A PERSON’S ACCESS TO SUCH INTERNET WEBSITES OR ACCOUNTS
BY A PERSON WHO PARTICIPATES IN THE ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING ACTIVITY.
(3) IN AN ACTION SEEKING INJUNCTIVE RELIEF, A VIOLATION OF
THIS SUBTITLE IS CONCLUSIVELY DETERMINED TO BE AN IRREPARABLE HARM.
(B) (1) IN ADDITION TO THE REMEDIES AVAILABLE UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY MAY
SEEK AN EX PARTE INJUNCTION TO:
(I) COMPEL A PLATFORM PROVIDER TO REMOVE OR DISABLE
ACCESS TO AN INTERNET WEBSITE VIOLATING THIS SUBTITLE OR A HYPERTEXT
LINK TO A WEBSITE VIOLATING THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) ENJOIN A FINANCIAL TRANSACTION PROVIDER FROM
PROCESSING TRANSACTIONS FOR THE ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING OPERATOR; AND
(III) COMPEL A PERSON TO DISCONTINUE SUPPORTING ILLEGAL
ONLINE GAMBLING IN THE STATE.
(2) A HEARING ON THE EX PARTE INJUNCTION MUST BE HELD WITHIN
30 DAYS AFTER IT IS FILED, AND AFTER THE HEARING THE COURT MAY CONVERT
THE INJUNCTION TO A PRELIMINARY INJUNCTION.

SENATE BILL 652
(C) (1) THE RELIEF GRANTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS
SECTION AGAINST A PLATFORM PROVIDER THAT IS NOT OTHERWISE ENGAGED IN
ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING SHALL:
(I) BE LIMITED TO THE REMOVAL OF OR DISABLING OF ACCESS
TO THE INTERNET WEBSITE VIOLATING THIS SUBTITLE, OR A HYPERTEXT LINK TO
AN INTERNET WEBSITE VIOLATING THIS SUBTITLE, THAT IS STORED ON A
COMPUTER SERVER THAT THE PLATFORM PROVIDER CONTROLS OR OPERATES;
(II) SPECIFY THE INTERNET WEBSITE TO WHICH IT APPLIES;
AND
(III) SPECIFY THE INTERNET WEBSITE OR HYPERTEXT LINK TO
BE REMOVED OR ACCESS TO WHICH IS TO BE DISABLED.
(2) A VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ENTERED AGAINST A PLATFORM
PROVIDER IS PUNISHABLE BY A FINE OF $50,000 FOR A FIRST VIOLATION AND
$100,000 FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION FOR EACH DAY THAT THE ILLEGAL
GAMING ACTIVITY REMAINS ACCESSIBLE ON THE INTERNET WEBSITE TO PERSONS
PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(D) (1) THE RELIEF GRANTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS
SECTION AGAINST A FINANCIAL TRANSACTION PROVIDER OR OTHER PERSON THAT
SUPPORTS THE OPERATION, CONDUCT, OR PROMOTION OF ILLEGAL ONLINE
GAMBLING AND IS NOT OTHERWISE ENGAGED IN ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING SHALL:
(I) BE LIMITED TO THE SUSPENSION OF PROCESSING
TRANSACTIONS FOR THE ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING OPERATOR WITH PERSONS
PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN THE STATE;
(II) BE LIMITED TO CEASING SUPPORT OF THE OPERATION,
CONDUCT, OR PROMOTION OF ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING IN THE STATE; AND
(III) SPECIFY THE INTERNET WEBSITE TO WHICH IT APPLIES.
(2) (I) A VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ENTERED AGAINST A FINANCIAL
TRANSACTION PROVIDER OR OTHER PERSON THAT SUPPORTS THE OPERATION,
CONDUCT, OR PROMOTION OF ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING IS PUNISHABLE BY A
FINE OF $50,000 FOR A FIRST VIOLATION AND $100,000 FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT
VIOLATION.

SENATE BILL 652 13
(II) EACH ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING TRANSACTION THAT IS
PROCESSED AND EACH ACT OF SUPPORT OF ILLEGAL ONLINE GAMBLING
CONSTITUTES A SEPARATE VIOLATION.
9–1F–11.
THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ENTER INTO AGREEMENTS
WITH THE COMMISSION OR ANY FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY FOR THE EXCHANGE AND RELEASE OF INVESTIGATORY AND OTHER
INFORMATION IF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES THAT THE
RELEASE OF THE INFORMATION WILL BE CONSISTENT WITH THE POLICY OF THE
STATE AS REFLECTED IN THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1F–12.
THE COMMISSION MAY DENY, REVOKE, SUSPEND, CONDITION, OR LIMIT
LICENSES OR PERMITS ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION FOR FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH
THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1F–13.
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
9–1F–14.
THE DIVISION SHALL HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO ADOPT RULES, REGULATIONS,
AND STANDARDS TO FURTHER THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING THE
PREVENTION AND RESTRAINT OF THE CONDUCT AND OFFERING OF ILLEGAL ONLINE
GAMBLING TO PERSONS PHYSICALLY LOCATED IN THE STATE.
9–1F–15.
THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY, AND
THE COURT SHALL CONSTRUE LIBERALLY THIS SUBTITLE RELATING TO GAMBLING
AND BETTING TO PREVENT THE ACTIVITIES PROHIBITED.
9–1F–16.

SENATE BILL 652
THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE MARYLAND ILLEGAL ONLINE
GAMBLING ENFORCEMENT ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.